Utah statutes.
65A-1-5.   Attorney general -- Role in affairs of the council and division.

(1) (a)  The attorney general shall represent the division in any legal action relating to state lands and, upon request by the director, may institute action to enforce the provisions of this title.

(b)  Whenever an action is brought contesting a decision or act of the division, the division may be named a party in the case rather than the individuals that comprise the division.

(2)  All leases, contracts, and agreements entered into by the division shall be approved as to form by the attorney general prior to execution.

(3) (a)  All suits for the collection of rental and damages shall be instituted by the attorney general, upon request by the director, in the name of the state.

(b)  The attorney general, upon request by the director, shall prosecute actions for suppression costs or other damage caused by fires on state lands.



Amended by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

